Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Licenses

§§ 277-280.
Repealed. 2017, No. 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Jan. 1, 2019.

§ 280a.
Eligibility for licensure.

An applicant for licensure as a barber, cosmetologist, esthetician, or nail technician shall meet the qualifications for licensure established by the Director under the provisions of subchapter 2 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Jan. 1, 2019.

§ 281.
Postsecondary school of barbering and cosmetology; certificate of approval.

A school of barbering or cosmetology shall not be granted a certificate of approval unless the school:

Is a postsecondary school operating a program of professional education.

Employs and maintains a sufficient number of competent instructors and has apparatus and equipment sufficient for the proper and full teaching of all subjects of its curriculum.

Maintains a daily record of the attendance of each student and regular class and instruction hours, establishes grades, and holds examinations before issuing diplomas.

Requires a school term of training consistent with formal training requirements established by rule, which shall include practical demonstrations and theoretical studies in sanitation, sterilization, the use of antiseptics, and the use of appliances, devices, treatments, and preparations relevant to the field of licensure.

Regional vocational centers may offer courses of instruction in barbering or cosmetology without a certificate of approval from the Director, and State correctional facilities may offer courses of instruction in barbering without a certificate of approval from the Director; however, hours for licensing shall only be given for courses that meet the Director’s standards for courses offered in postsecondary schools of barbering or cosmetology certified by the Director.

A school of barbering or cosmetology shall not require, as a condition of training for licensure, that a person enter into a covenant not to compete with the training organization or an affiliate.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 40

, § 16; amended

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2013, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Jan. 1, 2019.

§ 282.
Shop; license.

A shop shall not be granted a license unless the shop complies with the rules of the Director and has a designated licensee responsible for overall cleanliness, sanitation, and safety of the shop.

The practices of barbering and cosmetology shall be permitted only in shops licensed by the Director, except as provided in sections 273 and 281 of this chapter and the rules of the Director.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 40

, § 16; amended

2005, No. 27

, § 26;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Jan. 1, 2019.

§ 283.
Examination.

An applicant who is otherwise eligible for licensure and has paid the required fees shall be examined.

The examination for a license shall include both practical demonstrations and written or oral tests in the area of practices for which a license is applied and other related studies or subjects as the Director may determine necessary.
(b) (1) The examination for a license shall include both practical demonstrations and written or oral tests in the area of practices for which a license is applied and other related studies or subjects as the Director may determine necessary.

The examination shall not be confined to any specific system or method and shall be consistent with a prescribed curriculum as provided by this chapter.

The Director may limit by rule the number of times a person may take an examination.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 40

, § 16; amended

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Jan. 1, 2019.

§ 284.
Issuance of license.

The Director shall issue a license to an applicant who has passed the examination as determined by the Director, has paid the required fee, and has completed all the requirements for the particular license.

The Director shall issue a license to the person who owns or controls a shop or school of barbering or cosmetology who has paid the required fee and is in compliance with the rules of the Director and the provisions of this chapter.

The license shall be conspicuously displayed for the customer in the licensee’s principal office, place of business, or place of employment.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 40

, § 16; amended

2005, No. 27

, § 27;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Jan. 1, 2019.

§ 285.
Licenses from other jurisdictions.

Without requiring an examination, the Director shall issue an appropriate license to a person who is licensed or certified in good standing under the laws of another jurisdiction with requirements:

substantially equal to those of this State; or

materially less rigorous than those of this State, if the person has had 1,500 documented hours of practice in not less than one year.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 40

, § 16; amended

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Jan. 1, 2019.

§§ 286-289.
Repealed. 2017, No. 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Jan. 1, 2019.